Florida, session 2026, SB656.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âSection 943.0411, Florida Statutes, is amended 22 to read: 23 943.0411âInternet Crimes Against Children Online Sting 24 Operations Grant Program for local law enforcement affiliates 25 agencies to protect children.â 26 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 27 (a)ââAffiliateâ means a local law enforcement agency in 28 this state which has a current memorandum of understanding with 29 an established Internet crimes against children task force or 30 which has been designated by the department as being in good 31 standing. 32 (b)ââGood standingâ means a local law enforcement agency in 33 this state that receives CyberTips from one of the task forces 34 and follows Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force Program 35 standards in its investigation of Internet crimes against 36 children. 37 (c)ââInternet crimes against children task forceâ means an 38 Internet crimes against children task force located in this 39 state which is recognized by the United States Department of 40 Justice. 41 (2)âThere is created within the department the Internet 42 Crimes Against Children Online Sting Operations Grant Program to 43 award grants to local law enforcement affiliates agencies to 44 support their work to combat online child exploitation and 45 creation of sting operations to target individuals online 46 preying upon children or attempting to do so. 47 (3)(2)âThe department shall annually award to local law 48 enforcement affiliates agencies any funds specifically 49 appropriated for the grant program to cover expenses related to 50 their work to combat Internet crimes against children. The funds 51 may be awarded to cover overtime pay, travel, investigative or 52 digital forensics training, hardware, or computers, electronics, 53 software, and other related necessary supplies. Grants must be 54 provided to local law enforcement agencies if funds are 55 appropriated for that purpose by law. The total amount of grants 56 awarded may not exceed funding appropriated for the grant 57 program. 58 (4)(3)âThe department may establish criteria and set 59 specific time periods for the acceptance of applications and for 60 the selection process for awarding grant funds. 61 Section 2.âSection 943.0421, Florida Statutes, is created 62 to read: 63 943.0421âInternet Crimes Against Children Task Force 64 Funding Program.â 65 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âFlorida 66 Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force Funding Program 67 Act.â 68 (2)âLEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.âThe Legislature finds that the 69 Internet Crimes Against Children Task Force Program administered 70 by the United States Department of Justice helps state and local 71 law enforcement agencies develop an effective response to 72 technology-facilitated child sexual exploitation and Internet 73 crimes against children. This help encompasses forensic and 74 investigative components, training and technical assistance, 75 victim services, and community education. The program is a 76 national network of 61 coordinated task forces representing over 77 5,400 federal, state, and local law enforcement and 78 prosecutorial agencies. The Legislature intends to create an 79 account dedicated to combating Internet crimes against children, 80 promoting education on Internet safety to minors and to the 81 public, and rescuing child victims from abuse and exploitation. 82 (3)âDEFINITION.âThe term âtask forceâ means an Internet 83 Crimes Against Children Task Force program located in this state 84 which is recognized by the United States Department of Justice. 85 (4)âESTABLISHMENT OF PROGRAM.âThe Internet Crimes Against 86 Children Task Force Funding Program is created within the 87 department to provide a stable funding source for the task 88 forces. 89 (a)âFunding for the program shall consist of moneys 90 appropriated by the Legislature. Program funds may be used only 91 to support the administration and activities of law enforcement 92 agencies in their efforts to combat Internet crimes against 93 children, including the funding of personnel, overtime pay, 94 training, travel, and technology purchases. 95 (b)âMoneys appropriated to the program must be distributed 96 in the following amounts: 97 1.âEighty percent divided equally among the task forces; 98 and 99 2.âTwenty percent to the department to support its efforts 100 in combating Internet crimes against children. 101 (5)âRULEMAKING.âThe department may adopt rules to implement 102 and administer this section. 103 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.